District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.95

Liquidation proceedings — Decree of involuntary dissolution.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 218, ch. 269, § 95
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.95.
1981 Ed., § 29-395.
1973 Ed., § 29-931g.